District of Columbia statutes.
22-3020.53

Defense to non-reporting.

(a)

Any survivor of domestic violence may use such domestic violence as a defense to his or her failure to report under this subchapter.

(b)

For the purposes of this section, the term “domestic violence” means intimate partner violence, as defined in § 16-1001(7), and intrafamily violence, as defined in § 16-1001(9).

May 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-257, § 253
as added June 8, 2013, D.C. Law 19-315, § 4, 60 DCR 1702
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-315 added this section.